Utah statutes.
16-10a-620.   Subscriptions for shares.
(1)  A subscription for shares entered into before incorporation is
irrevocable for six months unless the subscription agreement provides a longer
or shorter period or all the subscribers agree or the corporation consents to
revocation of the subscription and provided the subscription is not considered
revocable under the federal securities laws.
(2)  The acceptance by the corporation of a subscription entered into before
incorporation and the authorization of the issuance of shares pursuant thereto
are subject to Section 16-10a-621.
(3)  The board of directors may determine the payment terms of subscriptions
for shares that were entered into before incorporation, unless the
subscription agreement specifies them.  A call for payment by the board of
directors must be uniform so far as practicable as to all shares of the same
class or series, unless the subscription agreement specifies otherwise.
(4)  Shares issued pursuant to subscriptions entered into before incorporation
are fully paid and nonassessable when the corporation receives the
consideration specified in the subscription agreement.
(5)  If a subscriber defaults in payment of money or property under a
subscription agreement entered into before incorporation, the corporation may
collect the amount owed as any other debt.  Alternatively, unless the
subscription agreement provides otherwise, the corporation may rescind the
agreement and may sell the shares if the debt remains unpaid more than 20 days
after the corporation sends written demand for payment to the subscriber.
(6)  A subscription agreement entered into after incorporation is a contract
between the subscriber and the corporation subject to Section 16-10a-621.
